California, session 20252026, AB1492.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 300 of the Elections Code is amended to read:300. (a) “Vote by mail voter” means any a voter casting who casts a ballot in any way other than at the a polling place.(b) “Military or overseas voter” means an elector absent from the county in which he or she the voter is otherwise eligible to vote who is any of the following:(1) A member of the active or reserve components of the United States Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard; a Merchant Marine; a member of the United States Public Health Service Commissioned Corps; a member of the National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration Commissioned Corps of the United States; or a member on activated status of the National Guard or state militia.(2) A citizen of the United States living outside of the territorial limits of the United States or the District of Columbia.(3) A spouse or dependent of a person described in paragraph (1).